sk-SK: Poloha ventilu motora: Výfuk; Nasávanie; Nasávanie a výfuk (súprava); Iné
nl: Motorklep positie: Uitlaat; Inlaat; Inlaat & uitlaat (set); Overig
fi: Moottorin venttiilien sijainti: Pako; Imu; Imu ja pako (sarja); Muu
hr-HR: Položaj ventila motora: Ispušni; Usisni; Usisni i ispušni (komplet); Ostalo
ru: Положение клапана двигателя: Выпускной; Впускной; Впускной и выпускной (набор); Другое
pt-PT: Posição da válvula do motor: Escape; Admissão; Admissão e escape (conjunto); Outro
sl-SI: Položaj ventila motorja: Izpušni; Sesalni; Sesalni in izpušni (komplet); Drugo
vi: Vị trí van động cơ: Xả; Nạp; Nạp và xả (bộ); Khác
sv: Motorns ventilposition: Avgas; Insug; Insug och avgas (sats); Annat
bg-BG: Положение на клапана на двигателя: Изпускателен; Всмукателен; Всмукателен и изпускателен (комплект); Друго
ko: 엔진 밸브 위치: 배기; 흡기; 흡기 및 배기(세트); 기타
en: Engine valve position: Exhaust; Intake; Intake & exhaust (set); Other
hu: Motorszelep helyzete: Kipufogó; Szívó; Szívó és kipufogó (készlet); Egyéb
pl: Pozycja zaworu silnika: Wydechowy; Dolotowy; Dolotowy i wydechowy (zestaw); Inne
zh-CN: 发动机气门位置: 排气; 进气; 进气和排气（套件）; 其他
nb: Motorventilposisjon: Eksos; Innsug; Innsug og eksos (sett); Annet
el: Θέση βαλβίδας κινητήρα: Εξαγωγή; Εισαγωγή; Εισαγωγή & εξαγωγή (σετ); Άλλο
it: Posizione della valvola del motore: Scarico; Aspirazione; Aspirazione e scarico (set); Altro
da: Motorventilens placering: Udstødning; Indsugning; Indsugning og udstødning (sæt); Andet
pt-BR: Posição da válvula do motor: Escapamento; Admissão; Admissão e escapamento (conjunto); Outro
es: Posición de la válvula del motor: Escape; Admisión; Admisión y escape (juego); Otra
zh-TW: 引擎氣門位置: 排氣; 進氣; 進氣與排氣 (套組); 其他
ja: エンジンバルブ位置: エキゾースト; インテーク; インテーク & エキゾースト (セット); その他
fr: Position de la soupape moteur: Échappement; Admission; Admission et échappement (jeu); Autre
ro-RO: Poziția supapelor motorului: Evacuare; Admisie; Admisie și evacuare (set); Altele
cs: Umístění ventilů motoru: Výfukový; Sací; Sací a výfukový (sada); Jiné
lt-LT: Variklio vožtuvo padėtis: Išmetimo; Įsiurbimo; Įsiurbimo ir išmetimo (komplektas); Kita
tr: Motor valf konumu: Egzoz; Emme; Emme ve egzoz (set); Diğer
th: ตำแหน่งวาล์วเครื่องยนต์: ไอเสีย; ไอดี; ไอดีและไอเสีย (ชุด); อื่นๆ
de: Position des Motorventils: Auslass; Einlass; Einlass & Auslass (Set); Sonstige